Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.370

Failure to appear—Bond forfeiture—Arrest—Recovery on bond.

If the prisoner is admitted to bail, and fails to appear and surrender himself or herself according to the conditions of his or her bond, the judge, or magistrate by proper order, shall declare the bond forfeited and order his or her immediate arrest without warrant if he or she be within this state. Recovery may be had on such bond in the name of the state as in the case of other bonds given by the accused in criminal proceedings within this state.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1080; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 18.]